Hawaii, session 2025, HB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the return-to-home pilot program established by Act 94, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, has been a success, sending over one hundred homeless individuals back to their home states in the State's partnership with The Institute for Human Services, Inc. The legislature further finds that additional manpower would assist in furthering the program. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to repeal the return‑to-home pilot program, establish the return-to-home program on a permanent basis, and appropriate funds for the program's continued operations. SECTION 2.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XVIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-     Return-to-home program.  (a) The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions shall coordinate a voluntary homeless assistance program, to be known as the return-to-home program, to provide eligible homeless individuals with assistance in being reunited with family and relatives in the individual's home state. The office shall establish a public-private partnership by contracting with eligible nonprofit organizations, for-profit organizations, or foundations to administer the program in compliance with chapters 103D and 103F.  The governor's coordinator on homelessness may assist with the implementation of this program. (b)  An individual who is homeless shall be eligible to participate in the return-to-home program if: (1)  The individual's participation is completely voluntary; (2)  The individual, if on parole, probation, or awaiting a court hearing or sentencing, has proper clearance from the court to participate in the program; (3)  The individual is indigent and lacks the financial resources necessary to secure transportation to return to the individual's home state; (4)  The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions, or an agency contracted to administer the program, contacts the family or support group of the individual and the family or support group confirms their acceptance of the individual returning to their home; and (5)  The individual's family or support group agrees to pay for half of the cost of transportation for the individual to return to the individual's home state; provided that this paragraph shall not apply if the family or support group lacks the resources necessary to cover half the cost of transportation for the individual; provided further that the office or the agency contracted to administer the program shall verify the family or support group's lack of resources before covering the entire flight cost of the individual. (c)  An individual shall participate in the return-to-home program only once and shall sign an agreement to this effect before participating in the program.  The agreement shall be kept on file with the statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions. (d)  The return-to-home program shall actively seek the participation of local airlines, cruise lines, charter companies, homeless programs, travel agencies, and the visitor industry to coordinate and implement the program. (e)  The return-to-home program shall assist program participants with necessary and proper preparations for travel, including obtaining proper identification, accessing public transportation to the airport, providing orientation relating to airport security, and ensuring sufficient personal hygiene. (f)  The statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations relating to the return-to-home program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session." SECTION 3.  Act 94, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, is repealed. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the return-to-home program, including: (1)       full-time equivalent (     FTE) position to assist and supervise the program; and (2)  Operation costs and other current expenses relating to the program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the statewide office on homelessness and housing solutions for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.